Georgia, session 2025_26, HB562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 3 of Article 2 of Chapter 4 of Title 12 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to surface mining, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"12-4-85.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'Trail Ridge' means the elevated, geological
feature bounded on the west by the Okefenokee Swamp and its watershed; on the east by
an elevation of 100 feet above mean sea level; on the south by the triple divide of the
Soldiers Camp Island, Boone Creek, and Barbar Branch watersheds; and on the north by
H. B. 562
- 1 -

LC 44 3004
the triple divide of the Upper Buffalo Creek, Big Creek, and Okefenokee Swamp
watersheds.
(b) Beginning on July 1, 2025, and continuing through June 30, 2030, the division shall
not accept any applications for new permits, nor shall the division accept any requests to
modify any existing permits for any surface mining operations on Trail Ridge that seek to
expand the area of affected land.
(c) This Code section shall not prohibit the acceptance or denial of any applications for
new permits or requests to modify any existing permits for any surface mining operations
on Trail Ridge submitted to and deemed complete by the division on or before June 30,
2025."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 562
- 2 -